Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.530

Charitable organization education account.

The charitable organization education account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the portion of fees designated in RCW 19.09.062 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the charitable organization education program authorized in RCW 19.09.510.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 29 s 16; 2007 c 471 s 14.]

NOTES:

Intent—2010 1st sp.s. c 29: See note following RCW 24.06.450.